Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB608.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5533(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5533. Cruelty to animal.* * *(b) Grading.--(1) Except as [set forth in paragraph (2)] specified in paragraphs (2) and (3), a violation of this section is a summary offense.(2) If the violation causes bodily injury to the animal or places the animal at imminent risk of serious bodily injury, a violation of this section is a misdemeanor of the second degree.123456789101112131415161718 (3) If the violation causes bodily injury to the animal due to the cropping, trimming or cutting off the whole or part of the ear or ears of the animal by a person who is not a licensed doctor of veterinary medicine or who is not acting in accordance with section 5542(a) (relating to animal mutilation and related offenses), a violation of this section is as follows:(i) A misdemeanor of the second degree for the first violation.(ii) A misdemeanor of the first degree for a second or subsequent violation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0608PN0616 - 2 - 123456789101112